Illinois, session 104th, HB5084.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cemetery Maintenance District Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 21, par. 64.24a)7    Sec. 1. (a) Any area within the boundaries of a single 8county may be incorporated as a cemetery maintenance district 9in the manner following:10    Fifty or more of the legal voters resident within the 11limits of such proposed district or a majority thereof if less 12than 100, may petition the circuit court for the county in 13which the proposed district is located to cause the question 14to be submitted to the legal voters of such proposed district, 15whether such proposed territory shall be organized as a 16cemetery maintenance district under this Act. Such petition 17shall be addressed to the court and shall contain a definite 18description of the boundaries of the territory to be embraced 19in the proposed district, and the name of such proposed 20district; provided, that the territory incorporated in any 21district formed hereunder shall be contiguous and may contain 22any territory not previously included in any cemetery 23maintenance district.  HB5084- 2 -LRB104 19309 SPS 32755 b1    Upon filing any such petition, in the office of the 2circuit clerk of the county in which such petition is made, the 3court shall consider the boundaries of any such proposed 4cemetery maintenance district whether the same shall be those 5stated in the petition or otherwise.6    Notice shall be given by the court of the time and place of 7a hearing upon the subject of the petition which shall be 8inserted in one or more daily or weekly papers published 9within the proposed cemetery maintenance district, or if no 10daily or weekly newspaper is published within such proposed 11cemetery maintenance district, then by posting at least 10 12copies in such proposed district at least 20 days before such 13meeting in conspicuous places as far separated from each other 14as consistently possible.15    At such hearing all persons in such proposed cemetery 16maintenance district shall have an opportunity to be heard 17touching the location and boundary of such proposed district 18and make suggestions regarding the same, and the court, after 19hearing statements, evidence and suggestions, shall fix and 20determine the limits and boundaries of such proposed district, 21and for that purpose and to that extent, may alter and amend 22such petition. After such determination by the court the same 23shall be incorporated in an order which shall be filed in the 24records of the court. Upon the entering of such order the court 25shall certify the order and the proposition to the proper 26election officials, who shall submit the proposition to the   HB5084- 3 -LRB104 19309 SPS 32755 b1voters at an election in accordance with the general election 2law. In addition to the requirements of the general election 3law, notice of the referendum shall include a description of 4such proposed district and the name of the proposed district.5    The proposition shall be in substantially the following 6form:7-------------------------------------------------------- 8    Shall.... cemetery              YES 9 maintenance district        -------------------------------- 10 be incorporated?                    NO 11-------------------------------------------------------------12    The court shall cause a statement of the results of such 13election to be filed in the records of the court. If a majority 14of the votes cast upon the question are in favor of the 15incorporation of the proposed cemetery maintenance district, 16such district shall thenceforth be an organized cemetery 17maintenance district under this Act, and the court shall enter 18an order accordingly and cause the same to be filed in the 19records of the court and shall also cause to be sent to the 20county clerk a certified copy of the order organizing such 21district.22    (b) On January 1, 2027, all cemetery associations in this 23State shall be incorporated as cemetery maintenance districts 24subject to this Act. The initial territory incorporated in a 25district created under this subsection shall be the land the 26cemetery association operated as a cemetery on the effective   HB5084- 4 -LRB104 19309 SPS 32755 b1date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.2(Source: P.A. 83-343.) 3    Section 10. The Cemetery Association Act is amended by 4adding Sections 25 and 30 as follows: 5    (805 ILCS 320/25 new)6    Sec. 25. Transition to cemetery maintenance districts. As 7provided in subsection (b) of Section 1 of the Cemetery 8Maintenance District Act, all cemetery associations in this 9State shall cease operating as cemetery associations on 10January 1, 2027. 11    (805 ILCS 320/30 new)12    Sec. 30. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 2028. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.